Utah statutes.
59-1-1502.   Specie legal tender is legal tender in the state -- Person may not compel another person to tender or accept specie legal tender -- Court or congressional action to authorize gold or silver coin or bullion as legal tender.

(1)  Specie legal tender is legal tender in the state.

(2)  Except as expressly provided by contract, a person may not compel any other person to tender or accept specie legal tender.

(3)  Gold or silver coin or bullion, other than gold or silver coin that is issued by the United States, is considered to be specie legal tender and is legal tender in the state if:

(a)  a court of competent jurisdiction issues a final, unappealable judgment or order determining that the state may recognize the gold or silver coin or bullion, other than gold or silver coin that is issued by the United States, as legal tender in the state; or

(b)  Congress enacts legislation that:

(i)  expressly provides that the gold or silver coin or bullion, other than gold or silver coin that is issued by the United States, is legal tender in the state; or

(ii)  expressly allows the state to recognize the gold or silver coin or bullion, other than gold or silver coin that is issued by the United States, as legal tender in the state.



Amended by Chapter 399, 2012 General Session

